North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 8. Nonprofit Corporation Established by Public Authority.

§ 159-42.1.
Establishment of nonprofit corporation by public authority authorized.

A public authority may establish, control, and operate a nonprofit corporation that is created under Chapter 55A of the General Statutes and is a tax-exempt organization under the Internal Revenue Code to further the authorized purposes of the public authority. A nonprofit corporation established as provided in this section shall not have regulatory or enforcement powers and shall not engage in partisan political activity.

History.

2015-122, s. 1.